Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 2 Capacity to Hold Real Estate

34-2-1.
Powers of aliens.

Aliens may take, hold, transmit, and convey real estate, and may sue for and recover possession of real estate in the same way and with the same effect as if they were citizens of the United States, and no title to real estate shall be invalid on account of the alienage of a former owner; but nothing contained in this section shall defeat the title to any real estate previously released or conveyed by the state or by authority thereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 201, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 252, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 296, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 432, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-2-1

.